District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.17

Repealed

Deposit of security — Amount.

Repealed.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 125, ch. 222, § 17
Sept. 8, 1960, 74 Stat. 862, Pub. L. 86-730, § 3
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155, § 14(e), 29 DCR 3491
1981 Ed., § 40-417.
1973 Ed., § 40-433.